Hawaii statutes.
[§39A‑234] Special purpose revenue
bonds exempt from taxation. Special purpose revenue bonds and the income
therefrom issued pursuant to this part shall be exempt from all state, county,
and municipal taxation except inheritance, transfer, and estate taxes. [L 1994,
c 280, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next